Washington statutes.
RCW 16.10.030

Dog control zones—Public hearing, publication of notice.

In determining whether a dog control zone should be established, the county commissioners shall call a public hearing, notice of which shall be published once a week for each of four consecutive weeks prior thereto in a newspaper of general circulation within the proposed zone. At such a hearing, proponents and opponents of the proposed dog control zone may appear and present their views. The final decision of the commissioners with respect to the establishment of such a zone shall not be made until the conclusion of the hearing.

[ 1969 c 72 s 3.]